District of Columbia statutes.
50-1707

Evidentiary effect; basis for civil liability.

Neither a violation of this chapter nor compliance herewith shall constitute any evidence of negligence or contributory negligence, nor shall either a violation or compliance provide any basis for a civil action for damages.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 8, 30 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 40-1207.